src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON VARGGAT-plc !!= @CODE@  Plural stems, sáme names.  Place names
                   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>                 VARGGATDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>Q1000@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK      ;

!!€gt-norm: Bieva #  test
!!$ Bievva:                Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Bieva:                 Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom
!!€ Bievajda:              Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill
!!€ Bievajs:               Bieva+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela

!LEXICON VARGGAT-org !!= @CODE@  Organizations. Not In use
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> VARGGATDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!LEXICON VARGGAT-obj
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> VARGGATDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:%>Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;


LEXICON VARGGATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ VARGGATUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ         ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON VARGGATUCASE
    +Ess:n     K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:Q1    K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j   K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q1j   RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:Q1jt  K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q1jda K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q1jn  K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q1js  K     ;
 +Pl+Com:Q1j   K     ;
! +Sg+Com:Q1X5jn K ;

!! Words in lexicon ALEUHTAT even-syllables assimilated plurals.

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc !!= @CODE@ Plural names, not sami names. like -váre, -gårtje
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ALEUHTATDECL-PLC ;

!!€gt-norm: Filippijna #  test
!!$ Filippijnna:              Filippijna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Filippijna:               Filippijna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom
!!€ Filippijnajda:            Filippijna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill
!!€ Filippijnajs:             Filippijna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela

!LEXICON ALEUHTAT-org
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org: ALEUHTATDECL-ORG ;

LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL-PLC
        @U.Cap.Obl@               ALEUHTATCASE ;
        @U.Cap.Opt@               LASJ         ; ! XXX Sub?
 +Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:00@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK       ;

!LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL-ORG
!        @U.Cap.Obl@             ALEUHTATCASE ;
!        @U.Cap.Opt@             LASJ         ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON ALEUHTATCASE
    +Ess:%>n   K     ;
 +Pl+Nom:      K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>j   K     ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>j   RHyph ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jt  K     ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>jda K     ;
 +Pl+Ine:%>jn  K     ;
 +Pl+Ela:%>js  K     ;
 +Pl+Com:%>j   K     ;
!+Sg+Com:%>jn  K     ;



!! !!Odd syllable case marking
! =============

!! Words in lexicon LONDON end on conconant, no cg, case marking with -av, -ij, -is, etc. Last syllable is unstressed. Gets a regular odd syllable case marking. Both real lule sami stems, assimilated stems and non-assimilated stems

LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
 +N+Prop+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>00@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;

LEXICON LONDON-sur !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable. Surnames. Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:%>is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames.
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!!€gt-norm: Åstot # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Åstot:                Åstot+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Åstodij:              Åstot+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Åstodis:              Åstot+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-ani !!= @CODE@ Animals
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> LONDONDECL ;
!!€gt-norm: Jubmel # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Jubmel:                Jubmel+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom
!!€ Jubmelij:              Jubmel+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill
!!€ Jubmelis:              Jubmel+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-org !!= @CODE@  Only singular Organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Klassekampen # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Klassekampen:                Klassekampen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Klassekampenij:              Klassekampen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Klassekampenis:              Klassekampen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-orgplc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL-PLC ;

LEXICON LONDON-mal !!= @CODE@ Male names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!!€gt-norm: Mátteus # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Matteus:                Matteus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Matteusij:              Matteus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Matteusis:              Matteus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-malsur !!= @CODE@ Names that can be both male- and surnames. Not used in smj-propernouns
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                LONDONDECL ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!!€gt-norm: Timeus # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Timeus:                Timeus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Timeusij:              Timeus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Timeusis:              Timeus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                LONDONDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #          ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!!€gt-norm: Luhták # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Luhták:                Luhták+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Luhtágij:              Luhták+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Luhtágis:              Luhták+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-malfem !!= @CODE@ Names that can be both male and female names.Not used in smj-propernouns
 +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Robin # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Robin:                Robin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Robinij:              Robin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Robinis:              Robin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-malplc !!= @CODE@ Names that can be both male- and placenames.Not used in smj-propernouns
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL-PLC ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> LONDONDECL     ;

!!€gt-norm: Jergol # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Jergol:               Jergol+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Jergolij:              Jergol+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Jergolis:              Jergol+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-plc !!= @CODE@ Only singular. Placenames
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL-PLC ;

!!€gt-norm: Njierek # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Njierek:                Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Njieregij:              Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Njieregis:              Njierek+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur !!= @CODE@ Names that can be both organizations and surnames.Not used in Smj-propernouns
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>                LONDONDECL-ORG ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>                LONDONDECL     ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #              ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

!!€gt-norm: Rieser # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Rieser:                Rieser+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom
!!€ Rieserij:              Rieser+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill
!!€ Rieseris:              Rieser+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects. 
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> LONDONDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Rovdjursutredningen # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Rovdjursutredningen:                Rovdjursutredningen+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Rovdjursutredningenij:              Rovdjursutredningen+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Rovdjursutredningenis:              Rovdjursutredningen+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects loan. Not used in smj-propernouns
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Sameloven # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Sameloven:                Sameloven+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!$ Samelovenij:              Sameloven+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!$ Samelovenis:              Sameloven+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela
