src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aleuhta:Aleuhta ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Alfaios:Alfa^i^os LONDON-mal ;
Alfaios:Alfa^i^os LONDON-mal ;
Altaiváre:Altai^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Amierik:Amierig9 LONDON-plc ;
Amul LONDON-mal ;
Andesváre:Andes^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Appalachiaváre:Appalachia^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Asjer LONDON-sur ;
Asor LONDON-mal ;
Atlasváre:Atlas^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Balkanváre:Balkan^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Bartolomaios:Bartoloma^ios LONDON-mal ;
Bartolomaios:Bartoloma^i^os LONDON-mal ;
Beaivváš LONDON-org ;
Biehtseluokt-Risstin:Biehtse^luokt-Risstin LONDON-fem ;
Biehtár LONDON-mal ;
Biergun LONDON-plc ;
Bietsisj-Risstin LONDON-fem ;
Bieva:Bieva VARGGAT-plc ;
Bievá VARGGAT-plc ;
Bihtám LONDON-plc ;
Biják:Bijág9 LONDON-plc ;
Breiðafjörður:Breiða^fjörður LONDON-plc ;
Bájal LONDON-plc ;
Bálák:Bálág9 LONDON-plc ;
Bári-Biehtár LONDON-mal ;
Bærggál LONDON-ani ;
Dardanella ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Divrá VARGGAT-plc ;
Dypfest:Dypfest9 LONDON-plc ;
Engebregtsen:Enge^bregtsen LONDON-sur ;
Evjatar LONDON-mal ;
Filippijna:Filippijna ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Filippos LONDON-mal ; 
Filippos LONDON-plc ; !village
Friijacampen:Friija^campen LONDON-org ;
Gierun LONDON-plc ;
Gráddas LONDON-plc ;
Gunnár LONDON-mal ;
Gárasavvun:Gára^savvun LONDON-plc ;
Gárjjelgoade:Gárjjel^goade VARGGAT-plc ;
Hebrijda:Hebrijda ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Helmuk+Use/-Spell:Helmug9 LONDON-plc ; !
Háhtsisj:Háhtsitj LONDON-ani ;
Ierik:Ierig9 LONDON-mal ;
Ievár LONDON-mal ;
Ieŋŋgis LONDON-plc ;
Ijvvár LONDON-mal ;
Ivvárstáde:Ivvár^stáde VARGGAT-plc ;
Iđut:Iđud9 LONDON-obj ;
Jannaj LONDON-mal ;
Janosj:Janotj LONDON-mal ;
Jievdeš LONDON-org ;
Jisaj LONDON-mal ;
Jubmel LONDON-ani ;
Jánosj:Jánotj LONDON-mal ;
Kafarnaum LONDON-plc ;
Kaijalainen LONDON-sur ;
Kaijanen LONDON-sur ;
Kajafas LONDON-mal ;
Kananaios:Kanana^ios LONDON-sur ;
Karolijna:Karolijna ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Karpáhtaváre:Karpáhta^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Katajainen LONDON-sur ;
Kaukasusváre:Kaukasus^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Keijonen LONDON-sur ;
Klassekampen:Klasse^kampen LONDON-org ;
Knutson LONDON-sur ;
Korállamerrabávte:Korálla^merra^bávte ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Kuoljok:Kuoljog9 LONDON-sur ;
Kusas LONDON-mal ;
Kárin LONDON-fem ;
Lakkadijva:Lakkadijva ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Lasaros LONDON-sur ;
Laulajainen LONDON-sur ;
Ludák:Ludág9 LONDON-fem ;
Luhták:Luhtág9 LONDON-fem ;
Lágŋas LONDON-plc ; 
Maijanen LONDON-sur ;
Maijen:Maijen LONDON-fem ;
Majoinen LONDON-sur ;
Maldijva:Maldijva ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Mariána:Mariána ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Muohtás LONDON-ani ;
Máijan LONDON-fem ; ! is this correct, or is it Essive?
Málák:Málág9 LONDON-plc ;
Mátteus:Mátte^us LONDON-mal ;
Märak:Märag9 LONDON-sur ;
Niagaragårtje:Ni^agara^gårtje ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Nijlas LONDON-mal ;
Nikodemos LONDON-mal ;
Njávisj:Njávitj LONDON-ani ;
Norcem LONDON-org ;
Norcem LONDON-org ;
Norges-gruppen:Norges-gruppen LONDON-org ;
Olgeš LONDON-org ;
Palmerednam:Palmer^ednam LONDON-plc ;
Pitám LONDON-plc ;
Pyreneaváre:Pyrenea^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Pávlus LONDON-mal ;
Rakav LONDON-fem ;
Reijonen LONDON-sur ;
Risstin LONDON-fem ;
Rávtas LONDON-plc ;
Sakkaios:Sakka^i^os LONDON-mal ;
Sebedaios:Sebeda^i^os LONDON-mal ;
Seldut:Seldud9 LONDON-plc ;
Serubabbel LONDON-mal ;
Sjekem LONDON-plc ;
Skáne VARGGAT-plc ;
Stanleygårtje:Stanley^gårtje ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Stanovoiváre:Stanovoi^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Stefanos LONDON-mal ;
Stuora% Julev LONDON-plc ;
Sunn-Risstin LONDON-fem ;
Ságat:Ságad9 LONDON-org ;
Sálat:Sálad9 LONDON-plc ;
Taddaios:Tadda^i^os LONDON-mal ;
Tiensjanváre:Tiensjan^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Timoteos:Timote^os LONDON-mal ;
Troanddem LONDON-plc ;
Tullingtoppen:Tulling^toppen LONDON-org ;
Tuoljá-Biehtár LONDON-mal ;
Ubbmem+Use/Sub:Ubmem LONDON-plc; !
Uralváre:Ural^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Utskarpen:Ut^skarpen LONDON-org ;
Verhojanskváre:Verhojansk^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Victoriaednam:Victoria^ednam LONDON-plc ;
Victoriagårtje:Victoria^gårtje ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Vinsonváre:Vinson^váre ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Voaga VARGGAT-plc ;
Vuojasj:Vuojatj LONDON-sur ;
Vássj-Ijvvár LONDON-mal ;
Vássten LONDON-plc ;
Ádám LONDON-mal ;
Álpa:Álpa ALEUHTAT-plc ;
Ámmul LONDON-mal ;
Ánjis LONDON-mal ;
Árnul LONDON-mal ;
Åstot:Åstod9 LONDON-sur ;
Šaldimárkan:Šaldi^márkan LONDON-plc ;
Gárásj:Gárátj LONDON-plc ; !village
Muttos LONDON-plc ;
Skabrram LONDON-plc ; !village
Tjårvek:Tjårveg9 LONDON-plc ;
Ballemvárásj:Ballem^várátj LONDON-plc ;
Hárált:Háráld9 LONDON-plc ;
Rijtjem LONDON-plc ;
